test/src/morphology/N-housut_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - housut - ok : # Noun 'tid' - eu tsekattu
     housut+N+Pl+Nom: housut
     housut+N+Pl+Gen: housuitten
     housut+N+Pl+Par: housui
     housut+N+Pl+Tra: housuiksi
     housut+N+Pl+Abe: housuitta
     housut+N+Pl+Ine: housuissa
     housut+N+Pl+Ela: housuista
     housut+N+Pl+Ill: houshuun
     housut+N+Pl+Ade: housuila
     housut+N+Pl+Abl: housuilta
     housut+N+Pl+All: housuile
     housut+N+Pl+Ess: housuina
     housut+N+Pl+Com: housuine
